Illinois, session 104th, HB3370.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986 is 5amended by changing Section 202 as follows: 6    (750 ILCS 60/202)  (from Ch. 40, par. 2312-2)7    Sec. 202. Commencement of action; filing fees; dismissal. 8    (a) How to commence action. Actions for orders of 9protection are commenced:10        (1) Independently: By filing a petition for an order 11    of protection in any civil court, unless specific courts 12    are designated by local rule or order.13        (2) In conjunction with another civil proceeding: By 14    filing a petition for an order of protection under the 15    same case number as another civil proceeding involving the 16    parties, including, but not limited to: (i) any proceeding 17    under the Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of Marriage 18    Act, Illinois Parentage Act of 2015, Nonsupport of Spouse 19    and Children Act, or Revised Uniform Reciprocal 20    Enforcement of Support Act or an action for nonsupport 21    brought under Article X of the Illinois Public Aid Code, 22    provided that a petitioner and the respondent are a party 23    to or the subject of that proceeding or (ii) a   HB3370 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 09691 JRC 19757 b1    guardianship proceeding under the Probate Act of 1975, or 2    a proceeding for involuntary commitment under the Mental 3    Health and Developmental Disabilities Code, or any 4    proceeding, other than a delinquency petition, under the 5    Juvenile Court Act of 1987, provided that a petitioner or 6    the respondent is a party to or the subject of such 7    proceeding.8        (3) In conjunction with a delinquency petition or a 9    criminal prosecution as provided in Section 112A-20 of the 10    Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963.11    (a-1) A petition for an order of protection may be filed in 12person or online. 13    (a-5) When a petition for an emergency order of protection 14is filed, the petition shall not be public until the petition 15is (i) served on the respondent or (ii) the respondent or 16respondent's counsel has filed an appearance and waiver of 17service. 18    Accessibility to the petition under this subsection prior 19to the petition being served on the respondent shall be in 20accordance with Section 5 of the Court Record and Document 21Accessibility Act. 22    (b) Filing, certification, and service fees. No fee shall 23be charged by the clerk for filing, amending, vacating, 24certifying, or photocopying petitions or orders; or for 25issuing alias summons; or for any related filing service. No 26fee shall be charged by the sheriff for service by the sheriff   HB3370 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 09691 JRC 19757 b1of a petition, rule, motion, or order in an action commenced 2under this Section.3    (c) Dismissal and consolidation. Withdrawal or dismissal 4of any petition for an order of protection prior to 5adjudication where the petitioner is represented by the State 6shall operate as a dismissal without prejudice. No action for 7an order of protection shall be dismissed because the 8respondent is being prosecuted for a crime against the 9petitioner. An independent action may be consolidated with 10another civil proceeding, as provided by paragraph (2) of 11subsection (a) of this Section. For any action commenced under 12paragraph (2) or (3) of subsection (a) of this Section, 13dismissal of the conjoined case (or a finding of not guilty) 14shall not require dismissal of the action for the order of 15protection; instead, it may be treated as an independent 16action and, if necessary and appropriate, transferred to a 17different court or division. Dismissal of any conjoined case 18shall not affect the validity of any previously issued order 19of protection, and thereafter subsections (b)(1) and (b)(2) of 20Section 220 shall be inapplicable to such order.21    (d) Pro se petitions. The court shall provide, through the 22office of the clerk of the court, simplified forms and 23clerical assistance to help with the writing and filing of a 24petition under this Section by any person not represented by 25counsel. In addition, that assistance may be provided by the 26State's Attorney.  HB3370 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 09691 JRC 19757 b1    (e) As provided in this subsection, the administrative 2director of the Administrative Office of the Illinois Courts, 3with the approval of the administrative board of the courts, 4may adopt rules to establish and implement a pilot program to 5allow the electronic filing of petitions for temporary orders 6of protection and the issuance of such orders by audio-visual 7means to accommodate litigants for whom attendance in court to 8file for and obtain emergency relief would constitute an undue 9hardship or would constitute a risk of harm to the litigant.10        (1) As used in this subsection:11            (A) "Electronic means" means any method of 12        transmission of information between computers or other 13        machines designed for the purpose of sending or 14        receiving electronic transmission and that allows for 15        the recipient of information to reproduce the 16        information received in a tangible medium of 17        expression.18            (B) "Independent audio-visual system" means an 19        electronic system for the transmission and receiving 20        of audio and visual signals, including those with the 21        means to preclude the unauthorized reception and 22        decoding of the signals by commercially available 23        television receivers, channel converters, or other 24        available receiving devices.25            (C) "Electronic appearance" means an appearance in 26        which one or more of the parties are not present in the   HB3370 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 09691 JRC 19757 b1        court, but in which, by means of an independent 2        audio-visual system, all of the participants are 3        simultaneously able to see and hear reproductions of 4        the voices and images of the judge, counsel, parties, 5        witnesses, and any other participants.6        (2) Any pilot program under this subsection (e) shall 7    be developed by the administrative director or his or her 8    delegate in consultation with at least one local 9    organization providing assistance to domestic violence 10    victims. The program plan shall include, but not be 11    limited to:12            (A) identification of agencies equipped with or 13        that have access to an independent audio-visual system 14        and electronic means for filing documents; and15            (B) identification of one or more organizations 16        who are trained and available to assist petitioners in 17        preparing and filing petitions for temporary orders of 18        protection and in their electronic appearances before 19        the court to obtain such orders; and20            (C) identification of the existing resources 21        available in local family courts for the 22        implementation and oversight of the pilot program; and23            (D) procedures for filing petitions and documents 24        by electronic means, swearing in the petitioners and 25        witnesses, preparation of a transcript of testimony 26        and evidence presented, and a prompt transmission of   HB3370 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 09691 JRC 19757 b1        any orders issued to the parties; and2            (E) a timeline for implementation and a plan for 3        informing the public about the availability of the 4        program; and5            (F) a description of the data to be collected in 6        order to evaluate and make recommendations for 7        improvements to the pilot program.8        (3) In conjunction with an electronic appearance, any 9    petitioner for an ex parte temporary order of protection 10    may, using the assistance of a trained advocate if 11    necessary, commence the proceedings by filing a petition 12    by electronic means.13            (A) A petitioner who is seeking an ex parte 14        temporary order of protection using an electronic 15        appearance must file a petition in advance of the 16        appearance and may do so electronically.17            (B) The petitioner must show that traveling to or 18        appearing in court would constitute an undue hardship 19        or create a risk of harm to the petitioner. In granting 20        or denying any relief sought by the petitioner, the 21        court shall state the names of all participants and 22        whether it is granting or denying an appearance by 23        electronic means and the basis for such a 24        determination. A party is not required to file a 25        petition or other document by electronic means or to 26        testify by means of an electronic appearance.  HB3370 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 09691 JRC 19757 b1            (C) Nothing in this subsection (e) affects or 2        changes any existing laws governing the service of 3        process, including requirements for personal service 4        or the sealing and confidentiality of court records in 5        court proceedings or access to court records by the 6        parties to the proceedings.7        (4) Appearances.8            (A) All electronic appearances by a petitioner 9        seeking an ex parte temporary order of protection 10        under this subsection (e) are strictly voluntary and 11        the court shall obtain the consent of the petitioner 12        on the record at the commencement of each appearance.13            (B) Electronic appearances under this subsection 14        (e) shall be recorded and preserved for transcription. 15        Documentary evidence, if any, referred to by a party 16        or witness or the court may be transmitted and 17        submitted and introduced by electronic means. 18(Source: P.A. 102-853, eff. 1-1-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 19103-166, eff. 1-1-24.)